Alaska statutes. Title 39. Public Officers and Employees.
Article 10. Employees First Hired on or after July 1, 2006.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 20, SLA 2007 (SB 123), proposing needed corrections and clarifications of statutes enacted as part of the 2005 legislation establishing defined contributions retirement plans and making related amendments to defined benefit retirement plans, see 2007 Senate Journal 567 — 570.

Sec. 39.35.700.
Applicability of AS 39.35.700 — 39.35.990.

The provisions of AS

39.35.700

—

39.35.990

apply only to members first hired on or after July 1, 2006, to members who are employed by employers that do not participate in the defined benefit retirement plan established under AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

, to former members as defined in AS

39.35.680

, or to members who transfer into the defined contribution retirement plan under AS

39.35.940

.

History.

(§ 122 ch 9 FSSLA 2005; am §§ 80, 81 ch 20 SLA 2007)

Sec. 39.35.710.
Defined contribution retirement plan established; federal qualification requirements.

A defined contribution retirement plan is established for employees of the state or a political subdivision or public organization of the state.

The defined contribution retirement plan is a plan in which savings are accumulated in an individual retirement account for the exclusive benefit of the member or beneficiaries. The plan is established effective July 1, 2006, at which time contributions by employers and members begin.

The retirement plan established by AS

39.35.700

—

39.35.990

is intended to qualify under 26 U.S.C. 401(a), 414(d), and 414(k) (Internal Revenue Code) as a qualified retirement plan established and maintained by the state for its employees, for the employees of political subdivisions, public corporations, and public organizations of the state, and for the employees of other employers whose participation is authorized by AS

39.35.700

—

39.35.990

and who participate in the plan set out in AS 39.35.700 — 39.35.990. Benefits under AS

39.35.880

are not provided by the defined contribution retirement plan.

An amendment to AS

39.35.700

—

39.35.990

does not provide a person with a vested right to a benefit if the Internal Revenue Service determines that the amendment will result in disqualification of the plan under the Internal Revenue Code.

History.

(§ 122 ch 9 FSSLA 2005; am § 82 ch 20 SLA 2007)

Administrative Code. —

For administration, see 2 AAC 35, art. 2.

Sec. 39.35.720.
Membership.

An employee who becomes a member on or after July 1, 2006, shall participate in the plan set out in AS

39.35.700

—

39.35.990

.

History.

(§ 122 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Applied
in

State v. Retired Pub. Emples. of Alaska, Inc., 502 P.3d 422 (Alaska 2022).

Sec. 39.35.725.
Participation of elected officials of political subdivisions.

An elected official of a political subdivision of the state that participates in both the plan and the defined benefit plan of AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

is a member of the plan if

the political subdivision covers elected officials under AS

39.35.600

—

39.35.650

and has designated elected officials under AS

39.35.957

as a classification of employees entitled to participate in the plan; and

the elected official receives compensation from the political subdivision for services as an elected official in the amount of at least $2,001 a month.

An elected official of a political subdivision of the state that participates in the plan but not the defined benefit plan of AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

is a member of the plan if

the political subdivision has designated elected officials under AS

39.35.957

as a classification of employees entitled to participate in the plan; and

the elected official receives compensation from the political subdivision for services as an elected official in the amount of at least $2,001 a month.

An elected official entitled to participate under this section, and who either has no previous service under the system with the political subdivision or is retired under the system, may file a waiver of participation in the plan with the administrator within 30 days after the later of June 7, 2007 or the date that the elected official’s term of office begins. A waiver is irrevocable for the remainder of the elected official’s service as an elected official or employee of the political subdivision.

History.

(§ 83 ch 20 SLA 2007; am § 22 ch 13 SLA 2008)

Sec. 39.35.730.
Contributions by members.

Each member shall contribute to the member’s individual account an amount equal to eight percent of the member’s compensation from July 1 to the following June 30.

[Repealed, § 116(a) ch 20 SLA 2007.]

The employer shall deduct the contribution from the member’s compensation at the end of each payroll period, and the contribution shall be credited by the plan to the member’s individual account. The contributions shall be deducted from the member’s compensation before the computation of applicable federal taxes and shall be treated as employer contributions under 26 U.S.C. 414(h)(2). A member may not have the option of making the payroll deduction directly in cash instead of having the contribution picked up by the employer.

History.

(§ 122 ch 9 FSSLA 2005; am § 116(a) ch 20 SLA 2007)

Administrative Code. —

For administration, see 2 AAC 35, art. 2.

Sec. 39.35.740.
Employment contributions mandatory.

Contributions of employees shall be made by payroll deductions. Every included employee shall be considered to consent to payroll deductions. It is of no consequence that a payroll deduction may cause the compensation paid in cash to an employee to be reduced below the minimum required by law. Payment of an employee’s compensation, less payroll deductions, is a full and complete discharge and satisfaction of all claims and demands by the employee relating to remuneration of services during the period covered by the payment, except with respect to the benefits provided under the plan.

History.

(§ 122 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 39.35.750.
Contributions by employers.

An employer shall contribute to each member’s individual account an amount equal to five percent of the member’s compensation from July 1 to the following June 30.

An employer shall also contribute an amount equal to a percentage, as adopted by the board, of each member’s compensation from July 1 to the following June 30 to pay for retiree major medical insurance. This contribution shall be paid into the Alaska retiree health care trust established by the commissioner of administration under AS

39.30.097(b)

and shall be accounted for in accordance with regulations established by the commissioner.

Notwithstanding (b) of this section, the employer contribution for retiree major medical insurance for fiscal year 2007 shall be 1.75 percent of each member’s compensation from July 1 to the following June 30.

An employer shall also make contributions to the health reimbursement arrangement plan under AS

39.30.370

.

An employer shall make annual contributions to a trust account in the plan, applied as a percentage of each member’s compensation from July 1 to the following June 30, in an amount determined by the board to be actuarially required to fully fund the cost of providing occupational disability and occupational death benefits under AS

39.35.700

—

39.35.990

and retirement benefits elected by disabled peace officers and firefighters under AS

39.35.890(h)(2)

. The contribution required under this subsection for peace officers and firefighters and the contribution required under this subsection for other employees shall be separately calculated based on the actuarially calculated costs for each group of employees.

History.

(§ 122 ch 9 FSSLA 2005; am §§ 84, 85 ch 20 SLA 2007; am § 23 ch 13 SLA 2008)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 134,
ch. 9, FSSLA 2005 provides that, notwithstanding (e) of this section, “for the first fiscal year in which the public employees’ defined contribution retirement plan is in effect, the employer contribution to fully fund the cost of providing occupational disability and occupational death benefits under
AS

39.35.890

and

39.35.892

shall be equal to

“(1) 0.4 percent of the compensation for peace officers and fire fighters; and

“(2) 0.3 percent of the compensation for all other employees.”

Under § 148, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, section 134, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005 takes effect July 1, 2006.

Sec. 39.35.760.
Rollover contributions and distributions.

An employee entering the plan may elect, at the time and in the manner prescribed by the administrator, to have all or part of a direct rollover distribution from an eligible retirement plan owned by the member paid directly into the member’s individual account.

Rollover contributions do not count as a purchase of membership service for the purpose of determining years of service.

A distributee may elect, at the time and in the manner prescribed by the administrator, to have all or part of an eligible rollover distribution paid directly to an eligible retirement plan specified by the distributee in the direct rollover.

In this section,

“direct rollover” means the payment of an eligible rollover distribution by the plan to an eligible retirement plan specified by a distributee who is eligible to elect a direct rollover;

“distributee” means a member, or a beneficiary who is the surviving spouse of the member, or an alternate payee;

“eligible retirement plan” means

an individual retirement account described in 26 U.S.C. 408(d)(3)(A);

an annuity plan described in 26 U.S.C. 403(a);

a qualified trust described in 26 U.S.C. 401(a);

an annuity plan described in 26 U.S.C. 403(b);

a governmental plan described in 26 U.S.C. 457(b);

an individual retirement annuity defined in 26 U.S.C. 408(b); or

on or after January 1, 2008, a Roth IRA described in 26 U.S.C. 408A;

“eligible rollover distribution” means a distribution of all or part of a total account to a distributee, except for

a distribution that is one of a series of substantially equal installments payable not less frequently than annually over the life expectancy of the distributee or the joint and last survivor life expectancy of the distributee and the distributee’s designated beneficiary, as defined in 26 U.S.C. 401(a)(9);

a distribution that is one of a series of substantially equal installments payable not less frequently than annually over a specified period of 10 years or more;

a distribution that is required under 26 U.S.C. 401(a)(9);

the portion of any distribution that is not includable in gross income; however, a portion under this subparagraph may be transferred only to an individual retirement account or annuity described in 26 U.S.C. 408(a) or (b), to a qualified plan described in 26 U.S.C. 401(a) or 403(a), or to an annuity contract described in 26 U.S.C. 403(b), that agrees to separately account for amounts transferred, including separately accounting for the portion of the distribution that is includable in gross income and the portion of the distribution that is not includable in gross income; and

other distributions that are reasonably expected to total less than $200 during a year.

History.

(§ 122 ch 9 FSSLA 2005; am §§ 86, 87 ch 20 SLA 2007)

Sec. 39.35.770.
Transmittal of contributions; claims against funds of an employer.

All contributions deducted in accordance with AS

39.35.700

—

39.35.990

shall be transmitted to the plan for deposit in the appropriate account or trusts as soon as administratively feasible, but in no event later than 15 days following the close of the payroll period.

If contributions are not transmitted within the prescribed time limit, interest shall be assessed on the outstanding contributions at the rate established under AS

39.35.610

from the date that contributions were originally due. Amounts due from an employer and interest as prescribed in this subsection may be claimed by the administrator from any agency of the state or political subdivision that has in its possession funds of the employer or that is authorized to disburse funds to the employer that are not restricted by statute or appropriation to a specific purpose. The amount claimed shall be certified by the administrator as sufficient to pay the contributions and interest due from the employer. The amount claimed shall be submitted to the administrator for deposit in the appropriate account or trusts.

Employers are responsible for administrative fees, investment fees, and investment losses charged to accounts established under AS

39.35.730

resulting from contribution adjustments due to employers enrolling members in the plan before the members are eligible for membership. Contributions made by employees shall be returned to the employer by reducing future employee contributions due. Contributions, net of fees and investment losses, made by employers shall be used to reduce future employer contributions due.

History.

(§ 122 ch 9 FSSLA 2005; am §§ 88, 89 ch 20 SLA 2007)

Sec. 39.35.780.
Limitations on contributions and benefits.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this plan, the annual additions to each member’s individual account under this plan and under all defined contribution plans of the employer required to be aggregated with the contributions from this plan under the provisions of 26 U.S.C. 415 may not exceed, for any limitation year, the amount permitted under 26 U.S.C. 415(c) at any time. If the amount of a member’s individual account contributions exceeds the limitation of 26 U.S.C. 415(c) for any limitation year, the administrator shall take any necessary remedial action to correct an excess contribution. A fixed benefit provided under this plan may not exceed, for or during a limitation year, the amount permitted under 26 U.S.C. 415(b). If a fixed benefit provided under this plan exceeds, for or during a limitation year, the amount permitted under 26 U.S.C. 415(b), the administrator shall take remedial action necessary to comply with the limits on the benefit amount in 26 U.S.C. 415(b). The provisions of 26 U.S.C. 415, and the regulations adopted under that statute, as applied to qualified plans of governmental employees are incorporated as part of the terms and conditions of the plan.

History.

(§ 122 ch 9 FSSLA 2005; am § 90 ch 20 SLA 2007)

Administrative Code. —

For administration, see 2 AAC 35, art. 2.

Sec. 39.35.790.
Vesting.

A participating member is immediately and fully vested in that member’s contributions and related earnings.

A member shall be fully vested in the employer contributions made on that member’s behalf, and related earnings, after five years of service. A member is partially vested in the employer contributions made on that member’s behalf, and the related earnings, in the ratio of

25 percent with two years of service;

50 percent with three years of service; and

75 percent with four years of service.

History.

(§ 122 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For administration, see 2 AAC 35, art. 2.

Sec. 39.35.800.
Investment of individual accounts.

The board shall provide a range of investment options and permit a participant to exercise investment control over the participant’s assets in the member’s individual account as provided in this section. If a participant exercises control over the assets in the individual account, the participant is not considered a fiduciary for any reason on the basis of exercising that control.

A participant may direct investment of plan funds held in an account among available investment funds in accordance with rules established by the board.

A participant may elect to change or transfer all or a portion of the participant’s existing account balance among available investment funds not more often than once each day in accordance with the rules established by the administrator. Only the last election received by the administrator before the transmittal of contributions to the trust fund for allocation to the individual account shall be used to direct the investment of the contributions received.

Except to the extent clearly set out in the terms of the investment plans offered by the employer to the employee, the employer is not liable to the participant for investment losses if the prudent investment standard has been met.

The employer, administrator, state, board, or a person or entity who is otherwise a fiduciary is not liable by reason for any participant’s investment loss that results from the participant’s directing the investment of plan assets allocated to the participant’s account.

To the extent that a member’s individual account has been divided as provided in a qualified domestic relations order between participants, each participant shall be treated as the holder of a separate individual account for purposes of investment yields, decisions, transfers, and time limitations imposed by this section.

History.

(§ 122 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 39.35.810.
Distribution election at termination.

A member is eligible to elect distribution of the member’s account in accordance with this section 60 days after termination of employment.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, distribution of all or a portion of the individual account of a member may take place before the 60th day after the termination of employment with the approval of the administrator if the member makes a written request for a distribution under this subsection. The member’s spouse must consent to the request in writing if the member is married. Distribution of an individual account may only be made on account of an immediate and heavy financial need of the member for the following reasons and in the amount the need is demonstrated for

medical care described in 26 U.S.C. 213(d) incurred by the member, the member’s spouse, or the member’s dependent, or necessary to obtain that medical care;

the purchase of a principal residence for the member;

postsecondary education tuition and related educational fees for the next 12-month period for the member, the member’s spouse, or a dependent of the member; in this paragraph, “dependent” has the meaning given in 26 U.S.C. 152;

prevention of the eviction of the member from the member’s principal residence or foreclosure on the mortgage of the member’s principal residence; or

any need prescribed by the United States Department of the Treasury, Internal Revenue Service, in a revenue ruling, notice, or other document of general applicability that satisfies the safe harbor definition of hardship under regulations adopted under 26 U.S.C. 401(k).

If a member dies before benefits commence, the member’s beneficiary is immediately eligible to elect distribution of the member’s share of the member’s individual account.

Distributions are payable to an alternate payee in accordance with the terms and conditions of a qualified domestic relations order that is received and approved by the administrator as specified in AS

39.35.860

.

Distributions that are being paid to a member may not be affected by the member’s subsequent reemployment with the employer. Upon reemployment, a new individual account shall be established for the member to which any future contributions shall be allocated. Upon subsequent termination of employment, the member’s new individual account shall be distributed in accordance with this section.

History.

(§ 122 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For administration, see 2 AAC 35, art. 2.

Sec. 39.35.820.
Forms of distribution.

A participant may elect to receive the participant’s share of the individual account in a

lump sum payment, which is a single payment of the entire balance in the account;

periodic lump sum payment, which is a payment of a portion of the balance in the account, not more than twice each year;

period certain annuity payment, which is an annuity payable in a fixed number of monthly installments for a duration of 60, 120, or 180 months;

life annuity with a period certain payment, which is an annuity payable until the later of the first day of the month in which the annuitant’s death occurs, or the date on which the payment of a fixed number of monthly installments is completed; the period certain for installments is 120 or 180 months;

single life annuity payment, which is an annuity payable monthly until the first of the month in which the annuitant’s death occurs;

joint and survivor annuity payment, which is an annuity payable monthly to the member until the first of the month in which the member’s death occurs; after the member’s death, a survivor annuity equal to 50 percent or 100 percent of the member’s benefit, as previously elected by the member, shall be paid monthly to the joint annuitant for the remainder of the survivor’s lifetime; or

payment as authorized by a regulation adopted by the commissioner of administration.

Upon the death of an annuitant whose payments have commenced, an annuitant’s beneficiary shall receive further payments only to the extent provided in accordance with the form of payment that was being made to the annuitant. The remaining portion of the interest shall continue to be distributed at least as rapidly as under the method of distribution being used before the annuitant’s death.

If a participant dies before the distribution commencement date, distribution of the participant’s entire interest to a beneficiary shall be payable in any form other than a joint and survivor annuity.

If an unmarried member or other participant fails to elect a form of payment before the distribution commencement date, the account shall be paid to a beneficiary in the form of a lump sum to the extent required by the minimum distribution requirements set out in the Internal Revenue Code. If a married member fails to elect a form of payment before the distribution commencement date, the account shall be paid in the form of a 50 percent joint and survivor annuity, with the member’s spouse as the joint annuitant.

History.

(§ 122 ch 9 FSSLA 2005; am § 2 ch 30 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective September 16, 2018, added (a)(7), and made related changes.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor's transmittal letter for ch. 30, SLA 2018 (HB 306), which added paragraph (a)(7), see 2018 House Journal 2243 — 2244.

Sec. 39.35.830.
Manner of electing distributions.

Any election or any alteration or revocation of a prior election by a participant for any purpose under this plan shall be on forms or made in a manner prescribed for that purpose by the plan administrator. To be effective, the forms required or the required action for any purpose under this plan must be completed and received in accordance with regulations adopted by the commissioner of administration.

At any time, but not less than seven days before the benefit commencement date, a member, alternate payee, or beneficiary may change

the form of payment election;

an election to commence benefits; or

the joint annuitant designation.

Changes in elections are not allowed on or after seven days before the benefit commencement date.

History.

(§ 122 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 39.35.840.
Distribution requirements.

Payments to a participant shall commence as soon as administratively feasible following the distribution commencement date. The distribution commencement date is the first date on which one of the following occurs:

a member meets the requirements of AS

39.35.810

and has made a complete application for payment under AS

39.35.830

;

a participant has elected to defer receipt of the account to a date specified, the date has been attained, and the participant has made a complete application for payment;

a member attains normal retirement age and has not made an application for payment or elected to defer receipt of the account to a date later than normal retirement age;

a member’s beneficiary does not make an application for benefits, and five years have elapsed since the member’s death;

notwithstanding (1) — (4) of this subsection, a participant whose account has a balance of $1,000 or less meets the requirements of AS

39.35.810

, at which time the participant must take payment of the participant’s account.

The entire interest of a member must be distributed or must begin to be distributed not later than the member’s required beginning date.

If a member dies after the distribution of the member’s interest has begun but before the distribution has been completed, the remaining portion of the interest shall continue to be distributed at least as rapidly as under the method of distribution being used before the member’s death.

If a member has made a distribution election and dies before the distribution of the member’s interest begins, distribution of the member’s entire interest shall be completed by December 31 of the calendar year containing the fifth anniversary of the member’s death. However, if any portion of the member’s interest is payable to a designated beneficiary, distributions may be made over the life of the designated beneficiary or over a period certain not greater than the life expectancy of the designated beneficiary, commencing on or before December 31 of the calendar year immediately following the calendar year in which the member died, and, if the designated beneficiary is the member’s surviving spouse, the date distributions are required to begin may not be earlier than the later of December 31 of the calendar year (1) immediately following the calendar year in which the member died, or (2) in which the member would have attained 70 1/2 years of age, whichever is earlier. If the surviving spouse dies after the member but before payments to the spouse have begun, the provisions of this subsection apply as if the surviving spouse were the member. An amount paid to a child of the member shall be treated as if it were paid to the surviving spouse if the amount becomes payable to the surviving spouse when the child reaches the age of majority.

If a member has not made a distribution election before the member’s death, the member’s designated beneficiary must elect the method of distribution not later than December 31 of the calendar year (1) in which distributions would be required to begin under this section, or (2) that contains the fifth anniversary of the date of death of the member, whichever is earlier. If the member does not have a designated beneficiary or if the designated beneficiary does not elect a method of distribution, distribution of the member’s entire interest must be completed by December 31 of the calendar year containing the fifth anniversary of the member’s death.

For purposes of (b) of this section, distribution of a member’s interest is considered to begin (1) on the member’s required beginning date, or (2) if the designated beneficiary is the member’s surviving spouse and the surviving spouse dies after the member but before payments to the spouse have begun, on the date distribution is required to begin to the surviving spouse. If distribution in the form of an annuity irrevocably commences to the member before the required beginning date, the date distribution is considered to begin is the date that the distribution actually commences.

Notwithstanding any contrary provisions of AS

39.35.700

—

39.35.990

, the requirements of this section apply to all distributions of a member’s interest and take precedence over any inconsistent provisions of AS

39.35.700

—

39.35.990

.

All distributions required under this section are determined and made in accordance with 26 U.S.C. 401(a)(9) and regulations adopted under that statute, including any minimum distribution incidental benefit requirement.

In this section,

“designated beneficiary” means the individual who is designated as the beneficiary under the plan in accordance with 26 U.S.C. 401(a)(9) and regulations adopted under that statute;

“required beginning date” means the first day of April of the calendar year following the calendar year in which the member either attains 70 1/2 years of age or actually terminates employment, whichever is later.

History.

(§ 122 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 39.35.850.
Designation of beneficiary.

Each participant shall have the right to designate a beneficiary and shall have the right, at any time, to revoke the designation or to substitute another beneficiary, subject to the following limitation: if a married member elects a nonspouse beneficiary, the value of the benefit payable to the beneficiary may not exceed 50 percent of the member’s portion of the account balance, and the member’s spouse shall automatically be considered the beneficiary for the remaining 50 percent of the account balance, unless the spouse consents to the beneficiary designation in a writing that is notarized or witnessed by the administrator. If the spouse consents in this manner, a married member may designate a nonspouse beneficiary for the entire benefit or any portion the benefit as part of an available form of payment contained in this plan,

except to the extent a qualified domestic relations order filed with the administrator provides for payment to a former spouse or other dependent of the member; or

unless the member filed a revocation of beneficiary accompanied by a written consent to the revocation from the present spouse and each person entitled under the order; however, consent of the present spouse is not required if the member and the present spouse had been married for less than one year on the date of the member’s death and if the member established when filing the revocation that the member and the present spouse were not cohabiting.

Except as provided in (a) of this section, the member may change or revoke the designation without notice to the beneficiary or beneficiaries at any time. If a member designates more than one beneficiary, each shares equally unless the member specifies a different allocation or preference. The designation of a beneficiary, a change or revocation of a beneficiary, and a consent to revocation of a beneficiary shall be made on a form provided by the administrator and is not effective until filed with the administrator.

If a member fails to designate a beneficiary, or if no designated beneficiary survives the member, the death benefit shall be paid

to the surviving spouse or, if there is none surviving;

to the surviving children of the member in equal parts or, if there are none surviving;

to the surviving parents in equal parts or, if there are none surviving;

to the estate.

A person claiming entitlement to benefits payable under AS

39.35.700

—

39.35.990

as a consequence of a member’s death shall provide the administrator with a marriage certificate, divorce or dissolution judgment, or other evidence of entitlement. Documents establishing entitlement may be filed with the administrator immediately after a change in the member’s marital status. If the administrator does not receive notification of a claim before the date 10 days after the member’s death, the person claiming entitlement is not entitled to receive from the division of retirement and benefits any benefit already paid by the administrator.

History.

(§ 122 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 39.35.860.
Rights under qualified domestic relations order.

Notwithstanding the nonalienation provisions in AS

39.35.900(a)

, the plan administrator may direct that benefits be paid to someone other than a member or beneficiary under a valid qualified domestic relations order that is executed by the judge of a competent court in accordance with applicable state law and that has been accepted by the administrator.

The administrator shall determine whether an order meets the requirements of this section within a reasonable period after receiving an order. The administrator shall notify the member and any alternate payee that an order has been received and indicate to the member and any alternate payee when the order is accepted. A separate account for the alternate payee portion shall be established as soon as administratively feasible after the order has been accepted by the administrator.

History.

(§ 122 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 39.35.870.
Eligibility for retirement and medical benefits.

In order to obtain medical benefits under AS

39.35.880

, an active member must retire directly from the plan. A member is eligible to retire from the plan if the member has been an active member for at least 12 months before application for retirement and

the member has at least 25 years of membership service as a peace officer or firefighter or at least 30 years of membership service for all other employees; or

the member reaches the normal retirement age and has at least 10 years of membership service.

The normal retirement age is the age set for Medicare eligibility at the time the member retires.

A member’s surviving spouse is eligible to elect medical benefits under AS

39.35.880

if the member had retired, or was eligible for retirement and medical benefits at the time of the member’s death.

Members shall apply for retirement and medical benefits on the forms and in the manner prescribed by the administrator.

Participation in the retiree major medical insurance plan is not required in order to participate in the health reimbursement arrangement.

A person eligible for retirement and medical benefits is not required to participate in the health reimbursement arrangement in order to participate in the retiree major medical insurance plan.

An eligible person must make the irrevocable election to participate or not participate in the retiree major medical insurance plan by reaching 70 1/2 years of age, or upon application for retirement and medical benefits, whichever is later.

History.

(§ 122 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 39.35.880.
Medical benefits.

The medical benefits available to eligible persons are access to the retiree major medical insurance plan and to the health reimbursement arrangement under AS

39.30.300

. Access to the retiree major medical insurance plan means that an eligible person may not be denied insurance coverage except for failure to pay the required premium.

Retiree major medical insurance plan coverage elected by an eligible member under this section covers the eligible member, the spouse of the eligible member, and the dependent children of the eligible member.

Retiree major medical insurance plan coverage elected by a surviving spouse of an eligible member under this section covers the surviving spouse and the dependent children of the eligible member who are dependent on the surviving spouse.

Major medical insurance coverage takes effect on the first day of the month following the date of the administrator’s approval of the election and stops when the person who elects coverage dies or fails to make a required premium payment.

The coverage for persons 65 years of age or older is the same as that available for persons under 65 years of age. The benefits payable to those persons 65 years of age or older supplement any benefits provided under the federal old age, survivors and disability insurance program.

The medical and optional insurance premiums owed by the person who elects coverage may be deducted from the health reimbursement arrangement. If the amount of the health reimbursement arrangement becomes insufficient to pay the premiums, the person who elects coverage under (a) of this section shall pay the premiums directly.

The cost of premiums for retiree major medical insurance coverage for an eligible member or surviving spouse who is

not eligible for Medicare is an amount equal to the full monthly group premiums for retiree major medical insurance coverage;

eligible for Medicare is the following percentage of the premium amounts established for retirees who are eligible for Medicare:

30 percent if the member had 10 or more, but less than 15, years of service;

25 percent if the member had 15 or more, but less than 20, years of service;

20 percent if the member had 20 or more, but less than 25, years of service;

15 percent if the member had 25 or more, but less than 30, years of service;

10 percent if the member had 30 or more years of service.

The eligibility for retiree major medical insurance coverage for an alternate payee under a qualified domestic relations order shall be determined based on the eligibility of the member to elect coverage. The alternate payee shall pay the full monthly premium for retiree major medical insurance coverage.

A person who is entitled to retiree major medical insurance coverage shall

be informed by the administrator in writing

that the health insurance coverage available to retired members may be different from the health insurance coverage provided to employees;

of time limits for selecting optional health insurance coverage and whether the election is irrevocable; and

indicate in writing on a form provided by the administrator that the person has received the information required by this subsection and whether the person has chosen to receive optional health insurance coverage.

The monthly group premiums for retiree major medical insurance coverage are established by the administrator in accordance with AS

39.30.095

. Nothing in AS

39.35.700

—

39.35.990

guarantees a person who elects coverage under (a) of this section a monthly group premium rate for retiree major medical insurance coverage other than the premium in effect for the month in which the premium is due for coverage for that month.

In this section, “health reimbursement arrangement” means the plan established in AS

39.30.300

.

History.

(§ 122 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)